incubator/apertium-ell-eng/apertium-ell-eng.ell.dix
    <pardef n="ι/ός__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ός</l><r>ός<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ό</l><r>ός<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ού</l><r>ός<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έ</l><r>ός<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>οί</l><r>ός<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ούς</l><r>ός<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ών</l><r>ός<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>οί</l><r>ός<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="λ/άρυγγας__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>άρυγγας</l><r>άρυγγας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρυγγα</l><r>άρυγγας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρυγγα</l><r>άρυγγας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρυγγα</l><r>άρυγγας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρυγγες</l><r>άρυγγας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρυγγες</l><r>άρυγγας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αρύγγων</l><r>άρυγγας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άρυγγες</l><r>άρυγγας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="κ/όκαλο__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>όκαλο</l><r>όκαλο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όκαλο</l><r>όκαλο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όκαλου</l><r>όκαλο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>οκάλου</l><r>όκαλο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όκαλο</l><r>όκαλο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όκαλα</l><r>όκαλο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όκαλα</l><r>όκαλο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όκαλων</l><r>όκαλο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>οκάλων</l><r>όκαλο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όκαλα</l><r>όκαλο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="σ/ύνδρομο__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ύνδρομο</l><r>ύνδρομο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύνδρομο</l><r>ύνδρομο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υνδρόμου</l><r>ύνδρομο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύνδρομο</l><r>ύνδρομο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύνδρομα</l><r>ύνδρομο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύνδρομα</l><r>ύνδρομο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υνδρόμων</l><r>ύνδρομο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύνδρομα</l><r>ύνδρομο<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="βορρά/ς__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ς</l><r>ς<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r>ς<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r>ς<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r>ς<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="αβγ/ό__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ό</l><r>ό<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ό</l><r>ό<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ού</l><r>ό<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ό</l><r>ό<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ά</l><r>ό<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ά</l><r>ό<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ών</l><r>ό<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ά</l><r>ό<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="λ/άτρισσα__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>άτρισσα</l><r>άτρισσα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άτρισσα</l><r>άτρισσα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άτρισσας</l><r>άτρισσα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άτρισσα</l><r>άτρισσα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άτρισσες</l><r>άτρισσα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άτρισσες</l><r>άτρισσα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ατρισσών</l><r>άτρισσα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άτρισσες</l><r>άτρισσα<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="απ/όγεμα__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>όγεμα</l><r>όγεμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όγεμα</l><r>όγεμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ογέματος</l><r>όγεμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όγεμα</l><r>όγεμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ογέματα</l><r>όγεμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ογέματα</l><r>όγεμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ογεμάτων</l><r>όγεμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ογέματα</l><r>όγεμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="αγαν/άκτηση__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>άκτηση</l><r>άκτηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άκτηση</l><r>άκτηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άκτησης</l><r>άκτηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ακτήσεως</l><r>άκτηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άκτηση</l><r>άκτηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ακτήσεις</l><r>άκτηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ακτήσεις</l><r>άκτηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ακτήσεις</l><r>άκτηση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Μεσαίωνας"><i>Μεσαίωνα</i><par n="βορρά/ς__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="αβγό"><i>αβγ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="αγαθό"><i>αγαθ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="αγανάκτηση"><i>αγαν</i><par n="αγαν/άκτηση__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ακουστικό"><i>ακουστικ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="απόγεμα"><i>απ</i><par n="απ/όγεμα__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ασβός"><i>ασβ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="βορράς"><i>βορρά</i><par n="βορρά/ς__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="γλυπτό"><i>γλυπτ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="γνωστός"><i>γνωστ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ειδωλολάτρισσα"><i>ειδωλολ</i><par n="λ/άτρισσα__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ερπετό"><i>ερπετ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="θαυμαστικό"><i>θαυμαστικ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="καθαρτικό"><i>καθαρτικ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="κενό"><i>κεν</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="κυνηγητό"><i>κυνηγητ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="κόκαλο"><i>κ</i><par n="κ/όκαλο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="λάρυγγας"><i>λ</i><par n="λ/άρυγγας__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="λάτρισσα"><i>λ</i><par n="λ/άτρισσα__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="λευκό"><i>λευκ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="λογισμικό"><i>λογισμικ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="λοχαγός"><i>λοχαγ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="μυστικό"><i>μυστικ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ναυτικό"><i>ναυτικ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="νερό"><i>νερ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="νυφικό"><i>νυφικ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="παγωτό"><i>παγωτ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="παλτό"><i>παλτ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="πιστοποιητικό"><i>πιστοποιητικ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ποσό"><i>ποσ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ποτό"><i>ποτ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="προορισμός"><i>προορισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="πρωινό"><i>πρωιν</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="σύνδρομο"><i>σ</i><par n="σ/ύνδρομο__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="τρωκτικό"><i>τρωκτικ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="υλικό"><i>υλικ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="υλισμικό"><i>υλισμικ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="φυλαχτό"><i>φυλαχτ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="χασμουρητό"><i>χασμουρητ</i><par n="αβγ/ό__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="χυμός"><i>χυμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="δημοκρατισμός"><i>δημοκρατισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ξεναγός"><i>ξεναγ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ερχομός"><i>ερχομ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="συνεργός"><i>συνεργ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ακροβατισμός"><i>ακροβατισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="φεμινισμός"><i>φεμινισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="πεσιμισμός"><i>πεσιμισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="σπασμός"><i>σπασμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="προσεταιρισμός"><i>προσεταιρισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="επαναδημοκρατισμός"><i>επαναδημοκρατισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="διαμελισμός"><i>διαμελισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="σεκταρισμός"><i>σεκταρισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="προγονός"><i>προγον</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="εξευγενισμός"><i>εξευγενισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="νεοφασισμός"><i>νεοφασισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="υλισμός"><i>υλισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="εθνοκομμουνισμός"><i>εθνοκομμουνισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="εθνικοσοσιαλισμός"><i>εθνικοσοσιαλισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ευτελισμός"><i>ευτελισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="εναγκαλισμός"><i>εναγκαλισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="χριστιανισμός"><i>χριστιανισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="αεροσυνοδός"><i>αεροσυνοδ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="προσχεδιασμός"><i>προσχεδιασμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="κλαυθμυρισμός"><i>κλαυθμυρισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="πειραματισμός"><i>πειραματισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="φλοιός"><i>φλοι</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="εκθειασμός"><i>εκθειασμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ψυχισμός"><i>ψυχισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="κριτικός"><i>κριτικ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="σφαγιασμός"><i>σφαγιασμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="διεθνισμός"><i>διεθνισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="εποικισμός"><i>εποικισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="μυστικός"><i>μυστικ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ενστερνισμός"><i>ενστερνισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="φονταμενταλισμός"><i>φονταμενταλισμ</i><par n="ι/ός__n_m"/></e>
